test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-istma54_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - `istma1: # Verb (54) `istma1 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     istma+V+Inf/mA: istma
     istma+V+Inf: istuq
     istma+V+Act+PrfPrc: istnuq
     istma+V+Pss+PrfPrc: istut
     istma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: istu
     istma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: istus
     istma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: [isti, istõ]
     istma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [istʼ, istõ]
